Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2093.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin INTEGRATING THE TRANSIT ASSISTANCE PROGRAM INTO THE MINNESOTA BENEFITS WEB PORTAL.new text end new text begin No later than December 31, 2025, the commissioner of Minnesota IT Services, in consultation with Metro Transit and the commissioners of transportation; human services; and children, youth, and families, shall fully integrate the transit assistance program administered by Metro Transit into the Minnesota benefits web portal. Metro Transit and the Metropolitan Council shall continue to process applications for the transit assistance program after integration into the Minnesota benefits web portal. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; TRANSIT ASSISTANCE PROGRAM INTEGRATION INTO THE MINNESOTA BENEFITS WEB PORTAL.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of Minnesota IT Services to fully integrate the transit assistance program administered by Metro Transit into the Minnesota benefits web portal. new text end